District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.11

Board of Psychology.

(a)

There is established a Board of Psychology to consist of 5 members appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council.

(b)

The Board shall regulate the practice of psychology and the practice by psychology associates.

(c)

Of the members of the Board, 4 shall be psychologists licensed in the District and 1 shall be a consumer member.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of 3 years.

(e)

Of the members initially appointed under this section, 1 shall be appointed for a term of 1 year, 2 shall be appointed for a term of 2 years, and 2 shall be appointed for a term of 3 years. The terms of the members first appointed shall begin on the date that a majority of the first members are sworn in, which shall become the anniversary date for all subsequent appointments.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 211, 33 DCR 729
Oct. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 7-31, § 3(e), 34 DCR 3789
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-14, § 2(c), 56 DCR 3613

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3302.11.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-14, in subsec. (b), substituted “psychology and the practice by psychology associates” for “psychology”.